California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) If a policy of mortgage guaranty insurance insures individual loans with a percentage claim settlement option on such loans, the insurer shall maintain a policyholders surplus based on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the face amount of the mortgage, the percentage coverage or claim settlement option, and the loan-to-value category.

The required amount of policyholders surplus shall be calculated in the following manner:

(1) If the total indebtedness is greater than 75 percent of the value of the collateral property at the date of the insurance:PolicyholdersPolicyholdersSurplus per $100Surplus per $100of the Faceof the FacePercentAmount of thePercentAmount of theCoverageMortgageCoverageMortgage5%$ .20 55%$1.50 10 .40601.5515 .60651.6020 .80701.65251.00751.75301.10801.80351.20851.85401.30901.90451.35951.95501.40100 2.00If the percent coverage is between any five-point increment, then the factor for policyholders surplus per one hundred dollars ($100) of the face amount of the mortgage shall be prorated.

(2) If the total indebtedness is at least 50 percent and not more than 75 percent of the value of the collateral property at the date of insurance, the required amount of policyholders surplus shall be 50 percent of the amount required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(3) If the total indebtedness is less than 50
 percent of the value of the collateral property at the date of insurance, the required amount of policyholders surplus shall be 25 percent of the amount required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(c) If a policy of mortgage guaranty insurance provides coverage on a group of loans subject to an aggregate loss limit, the policyholders surplus shall be:

(1) If the equity is not more than 50 percent and is at least 20 percent, or equity plus prior insurance or a deductible equals 25 percent of the value of the collateral property at the date of insurance, the required amount of policyholders surplus shall be calculated as follows:PolicyholdersPolicyholdersSurplus per $100Surplus per $100of the Faceof the FacePercentAmount of thePercentAmount of theCoverageMortgageCoverageMortgage 1%$ .30 50%$ .825 5 .5060 .8510 .6070 .87515 .6575 .9020 .7080 .92525 .7590 .9530 .775100 1.0040 .80If the percent coverage is between any specified increment, then the factor for policyholders surplus per one hundred dollars ($100) of the face amount of the mortgage shall be prorated.

(2) If the equity is less than 20 percent or the equity plus prior insurance or a deductible is less than 25 percent of the value of the collateral property at the date of insurance, the required amount of policyholders surplus shall be 200 percent of the amount required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(3) If the equity is more than 50 percent or the equity plus prior insurance or a deductible is more than 55 percent of the value of the collateral property at the date of insurance, the required amount of policyholders surplus shall be 50 percent of the amount of policyholders surplus required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(d) If a policy of mortgage guaranty insurance provides for layers of coverage, deductibles or excess reinsurance, the required amount of policyholders surplus may be computed by subtraction of the required policyholders surplus for the lower percentage coverage limits from the required policyholders surplus for the upper or greater coverage limit.

(e) If a policy of mortgage guaranty insurance provides for coverage on loans secured by second liens, the policyholders surplus shall be:

(1) If the policy provides coverage on individual loans, the required amount of policyholders surplus shall be calculated according to subdivision (b) after the percent of coverage and the loan-to-value ratios have been determined as follows:

(A) Divide the insured portion of the second loan by the entire loan indebtedness on the collateral property to determine the percent coverage.

(B) Divide the entire loan indebtedness on the property by the value of the collateral property at the date of insurance to determine loan-to-value percent.

(C) The face amount of insured mortgage shall mean the entire loan indebtedness on the property.

(D) Equity shall mean the complement of the loan-to-value
 percent.

(2) If the policy provides coverage on a group of loans subject to an aggregate loss limit, the policyholders surplus shall be calculated according to subdivision (c) after the percent of coverage and the loan-to-value ratios have been determined in accordance with paragraph (1).

(f) If a policy of mortgage guaranty insurance provides for coverage on leases, the policyholders surplus shall be four dollars ($4) for each one hundred dollars ($100) of the insured amount of the lease.

(g) (1) If a mortgage guaranty insurer will not have the amount of policyholders surplus required by this section, it shall cease transacting new business until such time that its policyholders surplus is in compliance with this section. At least 60 days prior to the time the policyholders surplus is estimated
 to fall below the amount required by this section, the insurer shall notify the commissioner and may request a waiver of the requirements of this subdivision. If the commissioner fails to issue an order in response to the waiver request within 60 days after the insurer requests a waiver, the insurer may continue transacting new business in California until the commissioner issues an order. The commissioner may retain consultants, including accountants, actuaries, or other experts, to assist the commissioner in the review of the information reasonably necessary to evaluate the waiver request made pursuant to this subdivision, and the insurer shall bear the commissioner’s cost of retaining those consultants. The insurer shall reimburse the commissioner for the cost of a hearing held pursuant to this subdivision unless the insurer has expressly waived the right to a hearing. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to limit the commissioner’s authority under any other provision of this code.

(2) An insurer who notifies the commissioner within 10 business days following the effective date of this section that its policyholders surplus is estimated to fall below the amount required by this section shall be deemed to have complied with the 60-day notice required by subdivision (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   (SB 291)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.06.

A mortgage guaranty insurer shall not declare any dividends except from undivided profits remaining on hand over and above the aggregate of its paid-in capital, paid-in surplus and contingency reserve.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Limitations and Restrictions for Transacting Business [12640.07. - 12640.11.]

12640.07.

(a) Mortgage guaranty insurance may be transacted in this state only by a stock or mutual casualty insurer holding a certificate of authority for the transaction of the insurance pursuant to this chapter, and shall be written only to insure either of the following:

(1) Loans secured by first liens on authorized real estate securities not exceeding, at the time the loan is made, 103 percent of the fair market value of the authorized real estate security, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12640.02.

(2) Loans secured by junior liens, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12640.02.

(b) Any reciprocal insurer engaging in this type of business shall be bound by all provisions of this chapter, including the requirements as to paid-in capital and paid-in surplus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 429, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.08.

A mortgage guaranty insurer shall not insure loans secured by properties in a single housing tract or a contiguous tract in excess of ten (10) percent of the insurer’s policyholders surplus. In determining the amount of such risk, applicable reinsurance in any assuming insurer authorized to transact mortgage guaranty insurance in this State shall be deducted from the total direct risk insured. “Contiguous,” for the purposes of this section, means not separated by more than one-half mile.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.09.

(a) A mortgage guaranty insurer shall limit its coverage for the class of insurance defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02 to no more than a net of 30 percent at risk of the entire indebtedness to the insured or, a mortgage guaranty insurer may elect to pay the entire indebtedness to the insured and acquire title to the authorized real estate security.

(b) (1) A mortgage guaranty insurer shall limit its coverage for the class of insurance defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02, to no more than a net of 30 percent of risk of the combined indebtedness of all existing mortgage loan amounts
 secured by all liens or charges on the real estate. Instead, a mortgage guaranty insurer may elect to pay the entire indebtedness to the insured and acquire title to the authorized real estate security.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a mortgage guaranty insurer may elect to insure a portfolio of loans secured by instruments constituting junior liens on real estate,
 if the total amount at risk in any one portfolio shall not at any time exceed 20 percent of the original principal amount of mortgage loans secured by junior liens.

(3) If the borrower is required to pay the cost of insurance written under paragraph (1) or (2), the lender shall disclose in writing to the borrower that the borrower is not a party to or a beneficiary of the mortgage guaranty insurance policy.

(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), if Freddie Mac or Fannie Mae increases the required amount of mortgage guaranty insurance, the commissioner may adopt regulations to increase the maximum coverage limitation of a mortgage guaranty insurer to an amount not to exceed a net of 35 percent of risk of the entire indebtedness.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), a mortgage guaranty insurer may extend its coverage for the class of insurance defined in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02 beyond the limits established by subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, if the excess is insured by a contract of reinsurance.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, mortgage guaranty insurance or reinsurance may be ceded by contract,
 if the assuming insurer is either of the following:

(A) A mortgage guaranty insurer, which may be under common control with the ceding mortgage guaranty insurer, but which does not own, and is not owned by, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, the ceding mortgage guaranty insurer.

(B) An insurer or reinsurer, that may be under common control with the ceding mortgage guaranty insurer, but that is not owned by, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, the ceding mortgage guaranty insurer or another mortgage guaranty insurer, that writes any type or types of insurance or reinsurance and that meets the following requirements:

(i) Has paid-in capital and paid-in surplus totaling at least thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000).

(ii) Derives, on an annual basis, at least 50 percent of its premium income from reinsurance; or, alternatively, derives at least twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of premium income per year from reinsurance.

(iii) Establishes and maintains its share of the reserve liabilities required by Section 12640.16 if licensed in this state, or establishes, maintains, and funds in accordance with Section 922.4 or 922.5, its share of the reserve liabilities required by Section 12640.16 if not licensed in this state.

(iv) Establishes and maintains its share of an amount equal to the greater of either the reserve liabilities required by Section 12640.04 or the policyholders surplus required by Section 12640.05 in a segregated trust which meets the requirements of Section 12640.091.

(2) This section does not permit the assuming insurer or reinsurer to directly write mortgage guaranty insurance.

(3) Any assuming insurer or reinsurer and the ceding mortgage guaranty insurer shall establish and maintain in the aggregate the reserves required by Sections 12640.04 and 12640.16.

(e) This section does not apply to the California Housing Loan Insurance Fund or to any program it may
 develop in conjunction with any federal or federally sponsored mortgage lender or insurer.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 105, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 62, Sec. 1.   (AB 1645)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.091.

(a) In order to qualify as a segregated trust under subdivision (d) of Section 12640.09, a trust shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Be established by an insurer or reinsurer for the benefit of the ceding mortgage guaranty insurer.

(2) Have the trust assets located in the mortgage guaranty insurer’s state of domicile, in the State of California, or in another jurisdiction which is approved by the commissioner.

(3) Be funded by assets permitted by Article 3 (commencing with Section 1170) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1, or by tax and loss bonds purchased pursuant to Section 832(e) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) Be subject to withdrawals only by, and under the control of, the ceding mortgage guaranty insurer provided that written notification with adequate supporting documentation is filed with the commissioner within 15 calendar days after the withdrawal.

(5) Consent to and be subject to examination by the commissioner.

(6) Appoint an agent for service of process in the State of California and file the appointment with the commissioner within 30 calendar days after the effective date.

(b) The trust agreement and any amendments to it shall be filed with the commissioner within 30 calendar days after its effective date. The commissioner may order a prospectively applicable modification, correction, disapproval, or termination of any trust arrangement, agreement, or amendment which fails to meet the requirements set forth in this chapter. Any order of the commissioner shall be in writing and shall specify the reasons for the modifications, corrections, disapproval, or termination.

(c) The ceding mortgage guaranty insurer shall make quarterly, annual, and interim reports on the segregated trust account at the time as they are required or requested by the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner.

(d) The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section including appropriate rules or regulations to assure that the trust assets are legally segregated, reasonably liquid, secure, and accessible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 772, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.095.

A mortgage guaranty insurer transacting the class of insurance defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02 may reinsure with either the type of reinsurer defined in subdivision (d) of Section 12640.09, or, any other insurer which has received written permission from the commissioner to write the type of insurance defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1084, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.10.

(a) An insurer that anywhere transacts any class of insurance other than mortgage guaranty insurance defined in paragraphs (1), (3), and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02 is not eligible for the issuance of a certificate of authority to transact those classes of mortgage guaranty insurance in this state nor for the renewal thereof. An insurer with a certificate of authority to transact the business of credit insurance in this state may also transact the business of mortgage guaranty insurance as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02, provided the insurer has received the written permission of the commissioner.

(b) An insurer that anywhere transacts the classes of insurance defined in
 paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02 is not eligible for the issuance of a certificate of authority to transact in this state the class of mortgage guaranty insurance defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02.

(c) An insurer authorized to transact the class of insurance defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02 shall maintain segregated accounts with respect to that insurance in the following manner if it anywhere transacts any other class of insurance:

(1) The minimum paid in capital and surplus required by Section 12640.03 and the reserves required to be established pursuant to Sections 12640.04 and 12640.16 shall be contributed to and maintained in the account.

(2) The income and assets attributable to the segregated account shall
 continuously remain identifiable with the particular account, but, unless the commissioner so orders, the assets need not be kept physically separate from other assets of the insurer. The income, gains, and losses, whether or not realized, from assets attributable to the segregated account shall be credited to or charged against the account without regard to other income, gains, or losses of the insurer.

(3) Assets attributable to the segregated account shall not be chargeable with any liabilities arising out of any other business of the insurer, and any assets not attributable to the account shall not be chargeable with any liabilities arising out of it.

(4) The segregated account shall be deemed an insurer for purposes of any proceedings in cases of insolvency and delinquency instituted, pursuant to applicable provisions of this code; provided, however, that account shall not be
 subject to the provisions of Article 14.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(5) Assets allocated to the segregated account are the property of the insurer, which shall not hold itself out to be a trustee of the assets.

(6) An insurer may own a particular asset in determinate proportions for that segregated account or for its general account.

(7) An insurer may, by an identifiable act, transfer assets for fair consideration between its segregated account and its general account.

(d) The written permission described in subdivision (a) shall be obtained by filing an application with the commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner accompanied by any additional information concerning the insurer, its conditions,
 and affairs, as the commissioner may require. A fee of two thousand two hundred forty-one dollars ($2,241) shall be paid in advance to the department for the filing of the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 83.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.11.

(a) Nothing in this chapter (commencing with Section 12640.01) shall be construed as limiting the right of any mortgage guaranty insurer to impose reasonable requirements upon the lender with regard to the terms of any note or bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a mortgage or deed of trust, such as requiring a stipulated down payment by the borrower.

(b) All statements and descriptions in any application for mortgage guaranty insurance or in negotiations for that insurance, and all documents relating thereto, submitted to the mortgage guaranty insurer shall be deemed to be representations and not warranties. Furthermore, misrepresentations and incorrect or incomplete statements in any such application, negotiations, and all documents relating thereto shall not prevent a recovery under a policy of mortgage guaranty insurance unless:

(1) Fraudulent; or

(2) Material either to the acceptance of the risk or to the hazard assumed by the insurer; or

(3) The insurer in good faith would either not have issued the mortgage guaranty insurance policy or extended coverage thereunder, or would not have issued the policy or extended coverage in as large an amount or at the premium rate as applied for or would not have provided coverage with respect to the hazard resulting in the loss if the true facts had been known to the insurer as required by the application for the policy or for the extension of coverage or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1476, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Rebates and Commissions [12640.12. - 12640.15.]

12640.12.

Every mortgage guaranty insurer shall adopt, print and make available a schedule of premium charges for mortgage guaranty insurance policies. The schedule shall show the entire amount of premium charge for each type of mortgage guaranty insurance policy issued by the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.13.

(a) No mortgage guaranty insurer shall pay to any person who is acting as agent, representative, attorney or employee of the owner, mortgagee of the prospective owner, or mortgagee of the real property or any interest therein, either directly or indirectly, any commission, or any part of its premium charges or any other consideration as an inducement for or as compensation on any mortgage guaranty insurance business.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), or the provisions of Section 751, activities of mortgage guaranty insurers in dealing with the secondary mortgage market, which are made available to the mortgage lending industry, whether insureds or not, shall not be deemed to be unlawful rebates or commissions. Included, but not limited to such activities, are the following:

(1) Services provided for the purpose of assisting in the purchase or sale of mortgage loans in the secondary market.

(2) Preparation of forms necessary for the sale of mortgage loans in the secondary mortgage market.

(3) Educational seminars dealing with issues affecting the mortgage lending industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.14.

No mortgage guaranty insurer shall make any rebate of any portion of the premium charge shown by the schedule required by Section 12640.12. No mortgage guaranty insurer shall quote any premium charge to any person which is less than that currently available to others for the same type of mortgage guaranty insurance policy. The amount by which any premium charge is less than that called for by the current schedule of premium charges is an unlawful rebate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.145.

No mortgage guaranty insurer shall pay any compensation to any person for transacting insurance for or with it based in whole or in part upon a commission basis unless such person is licensed pursuant to and subject to all the provisions of and restrictions in Chapter 5, Part 2, Division 1 of this code. This section shall not be construed so as to affect the meaning of any other provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.15.

The commissioner may after a hearing suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of any mortgage guaranty insurer which, after 10 days written notice from the commissioner requiring it to cease and desist, continues to pay any commission or to make any unlawful rebate in willful violation of the provisions of this article (commencing with Section 12640.12). The hearings of the commissioner shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Financial Statements [12640.16. - 12640.16.]

12640.16.

(a) The provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 900), Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1, relating to financial statements, shall apply to mortgage guaranty insurers.

(b) The unearned premium reserve shall be computed in accordance with the other applicable sections of this code, except that on all policies covering a risk period of more than one year the unearned premium reserve shall be computed in accordance with standards promulgated by the commissioner after appropriate hearings.

(c) In addition to the contingency reserve required under Section 12640.04, the case basis method shall be used to determine the loss reserve, which shall include a reserve for claims reported and unpaid and claims incurred but not reported, including:

(i) Estimated losses on insured loans which have resulted in the conveyance of property which remains unsold.

(ii) Insured loans in the process of foreclosure.

(iii) Insured loans in default for four or more months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Applicability of Other Laws [12640.17. - 12640.17.]

12640.17.

All the applicable provisions of this code and of other statutes of this state, except as the same may be in conflict herewith, shall apply to the operation and conduct of the business authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 77.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Additional Powers of Commissioner [12640.18. - 12640.18.]

12640.18.

The commissioner may adopt, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340 ) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, appropriate restrictions as to investments, giving full consideration to the desirability of high liquidity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 126.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Advertising [12640.19. - 12640.19.]

12640.19.

No bank, savings and loan association or insurance company, any of whose authorized real estate securities are insured by mortgage guaranty insurance pursuant to this chapter (commencing with Section 12640.01) may state in any brochure, pamphlet, report or any form of advertising that the real estate loans of the bank, savings and loan association or insurance company are “insured loans” unless the brochure, pamphlet, report or advertising also clearly states that the loans are insured by private insurers and the names of the private insurers are given and shall not make any such statement at all unless such insurance is by an insurer certificated to write in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Fees [12640.20. - 12640.20.]

12640.20.

The commissioner shall collect in advance a fee of four hundred seventy-two dollars ($472) from each mortgage guaranty insurer for the examination and analysis of the reinsurance contracts, final prospectus, and private placement memorandum filed with the commissioner after the issuance of a pool insurance policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 770, Sec. 26.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Land Value Insurance [12660. - 12661.]

12660.

Any person who in this state engages in the business of guaranteeing or insuring land values, or who solicits or negotiates in this state for the purpose of, or in any manner aids, any person within or without this state to engage in such business, is guilty of a public offense and punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not exceeding one year, or by fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 219.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

12661.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke or may deny any license or certificate issued under any provision of this code in any case where the applicant or licensee or certificate holder has committed an act denounced by section 12660.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6.1. HEALTH DISABILITY INSURANCE CONVERSION [12670. - 12692.5.]

12670.

It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that persons covered by a group policy, who become ineligible for that coverage have access to benefits pursuant to this part by requiring employers, employee organizations, and other entities that provide that coverage to their employees or members to also make available conversion policies for those persons and to ensure that insurers as herein defined offer conversion policies. The conversion policy shall be the most popular preferred provider organization product offered to residents of this state under the provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. In addition, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the continuation of group health coverage by requiring the entities herein defined to make available continuation benefits for widows, widowers, divorced spouses, and dependents who were covered by the group policy on the date of termination of coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative September 1, 2003, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 799.)
-------------------------------------------

12671.

As used in this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Group policy” means a group health insurance policy providing medical, hospital, surgical, major medical, or comprehensive medical coverage issued by an insurer, a group contract issued by a hospital service corporation, or medical, hospital, surgical, major medical, or comprehensive medical coverage otherwise provided by a policyholder to its employees or members, except for self-insurance programs provided by employers that are not exempt from
 the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA), as specified in subdivision (i). For the purposes of this part, a group policy not having an established annual renewal date shall be considered renewed on each anniversary of its effective date.

(b) “Conversion coverage” means health insurance benefits providing hospital, surgical, major medical, or comprehensive medical coverage issued to an individual under a converted policy.

(c) “Converted policy” means a policy or contract providing conversion coverage issued by an insurance company or by a hospital service corporation, or individual hospital, surgical, major medical, or comprehensive medical coverage otherwise provided by a policyholder to its employees or members.

(d) “Insurer” means the entity issuing a group policy, an individual or converted policy, a hospital service contract or an employer or employee organization otherwise providing medical, hospital, surgical, major medical, or comprehensive medical coverage to its employees or members.

(e) “Insurance” refers to health insurance, major medical, or comprehensive coverage paid by premium or contribution under a group policy, a hospital service contract, or as otherwise provided by a policyholder to its employees or members other than by self-insuring except in the case of a plan that is exempt from ERISA, but does include an employer plan that is exempt from ERISA as specified in subdivision (i). “Insurance” does not include any of the following:

(1) Coverage provided solely as an accrued liability or by reason of a disability extension.

(2) Medicare supplement insurance.

(3) Vision-only insurance.

(4) Dental-only insurance.

(5) CHAMPUS supplement insurance.

(6) Hospital indemnity insurance.

(7) Accident-only insurance.

(8) Short-term limited duration health insurance. “Short-term limited duration health insurance” means health insurance coverage
 provided pursuant to a health insurance policy that has an expiration date specified in the policy that is less than 12 months after the original effective date of the
 coverage.

(9) Specified disease insurance that does not pay benefits on a fixed benefit, cash payment only basis.

(f) “Policyholder” means the holder of a group policy issued by an insurer, a holder of a group contract issued by a hospital service corporation or an employer, employee association, or other entity otherwise providing medical, hospital, surgical, major medical, or comprehensive medical coverage on a group basis to its employees or members.

(g) “Premium” means contribution or other consideration paid or payable for coverage under a group policy or converted policy.

(h) “Medicare” means Title XVIII of the United
 States Social Security Act as added by the Social Security Amendments of 1965 or as later amended or superseded.

(i) “Employer plan that is exempt from ERISA” means an employer plan that, pursuant to Section 1003 of Title 29 of the United States Code, is not covered by or that is exempt from Subchapter I (commencing with Section 1001) of Chapter 18 of Title 29 of the United States Code, except that, in the case of a governmental plan, it only includes a self-insured governmental plan as defined in subdivision (j).

(j) “Self-insured governmental plan” means a self-insured plan established or maintained for its employees by a public entity, as defined in Section 811.2 of the Government Code, that is a governmental plan as defined in subdivision (32) of Section 1002 of Title
 29 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 687, Sec. 13.   (SB 910)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12672.

(a) Any group policy issued, amended, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1983, which provides insurance for employees or members on an expense-incurred or service basis, other than for a specific disease or for accidental injuries only, shall contain a provision that an employee or member whose coverage under the group policy has been terminated for any reason except as provided in this part, shall be entitled to have a converted policy issued to him or her by the insurer under whose group policy he or she was covered, without evidence of insurability, subject to the terms and conditions of this part.

(b) (1) This section shall be inoperative on
 January 1, 2014.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-91), this section shall become operative on the date of that repeal or amendment.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 441, Sec. 23.   (AB 1180)   Effective October 1, 2013.   Inoperative, by its own provisions, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

12673.

Conversion coverage shall be required to be made available to an employee or member unless such coverage under the group policy terminates for one or more of the following reasons:

(a) The group policy or the policyholder’s participation in the group policy terminates and the insurance is replaced by similar coverage under another group policy within 60 days of the date of termination of the group coverage or the policyholder’s participation.

(b) The employee or member has failed to make any required payment of the premium or contribution when due.

(c) The employee or member had not been continuously covered during the three-month period immediately preceding the employee’s or member’s termination of coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1186, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12674.

A converted policy shall be issued effective on the day following the termination of coverage under the group policy if written application and the first premium payment for the conversion policy are made to the insurer not later than 31 days after the termination of insurance, unless such requirements are waived in writing by the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1096.)
-------------------------------------------

12675.

The premium for the conversion coverage shall be determined in accordance with the insurer’s rates applicable to the age and class of risk of each person to be covered and to the type and amount of coverage provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1096.)
-------------------------------------------

12676.

The conversion coverage shall cover the employee or member and his or her dependents who were covered by the group policy on the date of termination of coverage. At the option of the insurer, a separate converted policy may be issued to cover any dependent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1096.)
-------------------------------------------

12677.

The insurer shall not be required to issue a converted policy covering any person if such person is entitled to be covered by Medicare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1096.)
-------------------------------------------

12678.

The insurer shall not be required to issue a converted policy covering any person if any of the following exists:

(a) The person is covered for similar benefits by another individual policy.

(b) The person is covered or is eligible to be covered for similar benefits by another group policy.

(c) The person is covered or is eligible to be covered for similar benefits under any arrangement of coverage for persons in a group whether insured or uninsured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 799, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative September 1, 2003, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 799.)
-------------------------------------------

12679.

A converted policy may provide that the insurer may at any time request information from any person covered thereunder as to whether he or she is covered for the similar benefits described in Section 12678. The converted policy shall provide that as of any premium due date the insurer may refuse to renew the policy or the coverage of any insured person for the following reasons only:

(a) Failure of the individual covered by the converted policy to provide the requested information.

(b) Fraud or material misrepresentation by the individual covered by the converted policy in applying for any benefits under the converted policy.

(c) Eligibility of the individual covered by the converted policy for coverage under Medicare or under any other state or federal law providing for benefits similar to those provided by the converted policy. As used in this section, “state or federal law” does not include Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Title XIX of the United States Social Security Act.

(d) Nonpayment of premium.
